Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5777.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-12-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-12 entitled "Rhode Island
Turnpike and Bridge Authority" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-12-9. Powers of authority.
(a) The authority is hereby authorized and empowered:
(1) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
(2) To adopt an official seal and alter it at pleasure;
(3) To maintain an office at such place or places within the state as it may designate;
(4) To sue and be sued in its own name, plead, and be impleaded; provided, however, that
any and all actions at law or in equity against the authority shall be brought only in the county in
which the principal office of the authority shall be located;
(5) To determine, subject to the approval of the director of transportation, the location and
the design standards of the Newport Bridge, the turnpike, and any additional new facility to be
constructed;
(6) To issue bonds of the authority for any of its purposes and to refund its bonds, all as
provided in this chapter;
(7) To combine for financing purposes the Newport Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the
Sakonnet River Bridge, the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, the turnpike, and any additional facility
or facilities, or any two (2) or more of such projects;
(8) To borrow money in anticipation of the issuance of bonds for any of its purposes and

to issue notes, certificates, or other evidences of borrowing in form as may be authorized by
resolution of the authority, the notes, certificates, or other evidence of borrowing to be payable in
the first instance from the proceeds of any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter and to
contain on their face a statement to the effect that neither the state, the authority, nor any
municipality or other political subdivision of the state shall be obligated to pay the same or the
interest thereon except from the proceeds of bonds in anticipation of the issuance of which the
notes, certificates, or other evidences of borrowing shall have been issued, or from revenues;
(9) To fix and revise, from time to time, subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to
charge and collect tolls for transit over the turnpike and the several parts or sections thereof, and
for the use of the Newport Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the
Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, and any additional facility acquired, financed, or leased under the
provisions of this chapter;
(10) To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers
and the performance of its duties;
(11) To acquire in the name of the authority, by purchase or otherwise, on such terms and
conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the rights of
condemnation in the manner as provided by this chapter, public or private lands, including public
parks, playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights therein, rights-of-way, property,
rights, easements, and interests as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of this
chapter; provided, however, that all public property damaged in carrying out the powers granted by
this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable;
(12) To designate the locations, with the approval of the director of transportation, and
establish, limit, and control the points of ingress to and egress from the turnpike and any additional
facility as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the authority to ensure the proper
operation and maintenance thereof, and to prohibit entrance to and exit from any point or points
not so designated;
(13) To employ, in its discretion, consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction
and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be
necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;
(14) To apply for, receive, and accept from any federal agency aid and/or grants for or in
aid of the repair, maintenance, and/or construction of the turnpike, the Newport Bridge, the
Sakonnet River Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, or any
additional facility, and to receive and accept from the state, from any municipality, or other political
subdivision thereof and from any other source aid or contributions of either money, property, labor,
LC001044 - Page 2 of 15

or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which the grants and
contributions may be made;
(15) To construct grade separations at intersections of the turnpike, the approaches, and
highway connections of the Newport Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge,
the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, and any additional facility with public highways, streets, or
other public ways or places, and to change and adjust the lines and grades thereof so as to
accommodate the same to the design of the grade separation; the cost of the grade separations and
any damage incurred in changing and adjusting the lines and grades of the highways, streets, ways,
and places shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project;
(16) To vacate or change the location of any portion of any public highway, street, or other
public way or place, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, and other equipment and
appliance of the state or of any municipality or other political subdivision of the state and to
reconstruct the same at such new location as the authority shall deem most favorable for the project
and of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway, street, way,
place, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, equipment, or appliance, and the cost of
the reconstruction and any damage incurred in vacating or changing the location thereof shall be
ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project; any public highway, street,
or other public way or place vacated or relocated by the authority shall be vacated or relocated in
the manner provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public roads, and any damages
awarded on account thereof shall be paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project;
(17) The authority shall also have the power to make reasonable regulations, subject to the
approval of the public utility administrator, for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair,
renewal, relocation and removal of tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and
other equipment and appliances (herein called “public utility facilities”) of any public utility as
defined in § 39-1-2, in, on, along, over, or under any project. Whenever the authority shall
determine that it is necessary that any public facilities that now are, or hereafter may be, located in,
on, along, over, or under any project should be relocated in the project, or should be removed from
the project, the public utility owning or operating the facilities shall relocate or remove the facilities
in accordance with the order of the authority; provided, however, that the cost and expenses of the
relocation or removal, including the cost of installing the facilities in a new location, or new
locations, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interests in lands, and any other rights acquired
to accomplish the relocation or removal, less the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands
or any other rights of the public utility paid to the public utility in connection with the relocation
or removal of the property, shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the
LC001044 - Page 3 of 15

project. In case of any relocation or removal of facilities, the public utility owning or operating the
facilities, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate the facilities, with the necessary
appurtenances, in the new location or new locations, for as long a period, and upon the same terms
and conditions, as it had the right to maintain and operate the facilities in their former location or
locations;
(18) To make reasonable regulations and to grant easements for the installation,
construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation, and removal of pipelines, other equipment,
and appliances of any corporation or person owning or operating pipelines in, on, along, over, or
under the turnpike, whenever the authority shall determine that it is necessary that any facilities
which now are, or hereafter may be located in, on, along, over or under the turnpike should be
relocated in the turnpike, or should be removed from the turnpike, the corporation or person owning
or operating the facilities shall relocate or remove the facilities in accordance with the order of the
authority; provided, however, that the cost and expense of the relocation or removal, including the
cost of installing the facilities in a new location, or new locations, and the cost of any lands, or any
rights or interests in lands, and any other rights acquired to accomplish the relocation or removal,
less the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands or any other rights of any corporation
or person paid to any corporation or person in connection with the relocation or removal of the
property, shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project. In case
of any relocation or removal of facilities, the corporation or person owning or operating the
facilities, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate the facilities, with the necessary
appurtenances, in the new location or new locations, for as long a period, and upon the same terms
and conditions, as it had the right to maintain and operate the facilities in their former location or
locations;
(19) To enter upon any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making such surveys,
soundings, borings, and examinations as the authority may deem necessary or convenient for its
purposes, and the entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purposes be
deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings; provided, however, the authority shall pay
any actual damage resulting to the lands, water, and premises as a result of the entry and activities
as a part of the cost of the project;
(20) To enter into contracts or agreements with any board, commission, public
instrumentality of another state or the federal government or with any political subdivision of
another state relating to the connection or connections to be established between the turnpike or
any additional facility with any public highway or turnpike now in existence or hereafter to be
constructed in another state, and with respect to the construction, maintenance, and operation of
LC001044 - Page 4 of 15

interstate turnpikes or expressways;
(21) To enter into contracts with the department of transportation with respect to the
construction, reconstruction, renovation, acquisition, maintenance, repair, operation, or
management of any project and with the Rhode Island state police with respect to the policing of
any project;
(22) To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the
performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter; and
(23) To do all other acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted in this chapter.
(24) To grant and/or contract, through the transfer of funds of the authority to the
department of transportation, for the construction, reconstruction, acquisition, maintenance, repair,
operation, or management by the department of transportation of any project or projects authorized
by this chapter, and the department of transportation is authorized to accept any such grant or
transfer of funds.
(b) Provided, the authority, in carrying out the provisions of this section, shall hold public
hearings prior to the finalization of any specifications or the awarding of any contracts for any
project. Provided, further, that any revenue generated by facilities under the control of the authority
shall only be used for the purposes of the authority.
(c) The authority is authorized to enter into contracts with the state, or any department of
the state, to operate and/or manage toll facilities on state roads or bridges not owned, leased by, or
under the control of the authority, and to collect tolls from such facilities on behalf of the
department of transportation, provided such tolls shall be set by the state acting through the
department of transportation pursuant to chapter 13.1 of title 42.
SECTION 2. Section 42-13-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-13 entitled "Department
of Transportation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-13-2. Organization and functions of the department.
(a) The department shall be organized in accordance with a project management-based
program and shall utilize an asset management system.
(1) A project management-based program manages the delivery of the department’s
portfolio of transportation improvement projects from project conception to the project completion.
Project management activities include:
(i) Managing and reporting on the delivery status of portfolio projects;
(ii) Developing overall workload and budget for the portfolio;
(iii) Developing and implementing the tools to estimate the resources necessary to deliver
LC001044 - Page 5 of 15

the projects; and
(iv) Developing and implementing processes and tools to improve the management of the
projects.
(2) Asset management is the process used for managing transportation infrastructure by
improving decision making for resource allocation. Asset management activities include a systemic
process based on economic, engineering, and business principles which includes the following
functions:
(i) Completing a comprehensive inventory of system assets;
(ii) Monitoring system performance; and
(iii) Performing analysis utilizing accurate data for managing various assets within the
transportation network.
(b) The director of transportation shall appoint a chief operating officer to oversee the day-
to-day operations of the department.
(c) The department shall be organized into such divisions as are described in this section
and such other divisions, subdivisions, and agencies as the director shall find are necessary to carry
out the responsibilities of the department, including: division of finance; division of planning;
division of project management; division of operations and maintenance; office of civil rights;
office of safety; office of external affairs; office of legal; office of personnel; office of information
services.
(d) The director may assign such other responsibilities as he or she shall find appropriate
and may reassign functions other than as set out in this section if he or she finds the reassignment
necessary to the proper and efficient functioning of the department or of the state’s transportation
system.
(e) The department shall submit a report annually no later than March 31 to the speaker of
the house, the president of the senate, and the house and senate fiscal advisors concerning the status
of the ten-year (10) transportation plan.
(f) Any functions, duties, and staff relating to the Rhode Island department of
transportation’s external audit section shall be transferred to the Rhode Island department of
administration’s office of internal audit, or its successor, upon passage [Feb. 11, 2016].
(1) The chief of the office of internal audit, or its successor, who shall be the administrative
head of the office of internal audit, or its successor, shall supervise, coordinate, and/or conduct
audits, civil and administrative investigations, and inspections or oversight reviews, when
necessary, relating to programs and operations listed in § 42-13-2.
(2) The office of internal audit’s (or its successor’s) authorization shall include, but not be
LC001044 - Page 6 of 15

limited to, evaluating the efficiency of operations and internal controls, preventing and detecting
fraud, waste, abuse or mismanagement in the expenditure of public funds, whether state, federal or
those revenues collected by the use of tolls and related to any and all transportation-related
programs and operations as well as the procurement of any supplies, services, or construction, by
the department of transportation or related institutions of the department of transportation.
Investigations may include the expenditures by nongovernmental agencies of federal, state, and
local public funds. As deemed necessary or expedient by the office of internal audit, or its
successor, audits may be made relative to the financial affairs or the economy and efficiency of
management of the department of transportation or related institutions.
SECTION 3. Chapter 42-13.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Rhode Island Bridge
Replacement, Reconstruction, and Maintenance Fund" is hereby repealed in its entirety.
CHAPTER 42-13.1
The Rhode Island Bridge Replacement, Reconstruction, and Maintenance Fund
42-13.1-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Rhode Island Bridge Replacement,
Reconstruction, and Maintenance Fund Act of 2016.”
42-13.1-2. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds that:
(1) The state of Rhode Island, through the Rhode Island department of transportation (“the
department”), funds the reconstruction, replacement, and maintenance of all bridges in Rhode
Island, except the Newport Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Jamestown-Verrazano Bridge, and
the Sakonnet River Bridge.
(2) According to the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) 2015 National Bridge
Inventory (NBI) data, there are seven hundred sixty-four (764) bridges in Rhode Island greater than
twenty feet (20′) in length. Of these NBI bridges, one hundred seventy-seven (177) bridges, or
twenty-three percent (23%), are classified as structurally deficient.
(3) For the past several decades, Rhode Island has depended on three (3) primary sources
for funding all transportation infrastructure construction, maintenance, and operations: federal
funds, state bond funds, and motor fuel tax revenue. Of these sources, two (2), federal funds and
motor fuel tax revenue, are mutable.
(4) The 2008 governor’s blue ribbon panel on transportation funding, the 2011 senate
special commission on sustainable transportation funding, and the 2013 special legislative
commission to study the funding for East Bay bridges determined that there is insufficient revenue
available from all existing sources to fund the maintenance and improvement of Rhode Island
LC001044 - Page 7 of 15

transportation infrastructure.
(5) In 2011, the general assembly adopted a component of the recommended systemic
change to transportation funding by dedicating increased resources from the Rhode Island capital
plan fund and creating the Rhode Island highway maintenance account, to be funded by an increase
in license and registration fees, beginning in FY2014.
(6) In 2014, the general assembly adopted changes to the Rhode Island highway
maintenance account to provide additional state revenue for transportation infrastructure in future
years.
(7) Although the state is shifting from long-term borrowing to reliance upon annual
revenues to fund transportation infrastructure on a pay-as-you go basis, and although a recurring
state source of capital funds has been established, there is still a funding gap between the revenue
needed to maintain all bridges in structurally sound and good condition and the annual amounts
generated by current dedicated revenue sources.
(8) According to the U.S. General Accounting Office, just one, fully-loaded five-axle (5)
tractor trailer has the same impact on the interstate as nine thousand six hundred (9,600)
automobiles. The department estimates that tractor trailers cause in excess of seventy percent (70%)
of the damage to the state’s transportation infrastructure, including Rhode Island bridges, on an
annual basis. However, revenue contributions attributable to tractor trailers account for less than
twenty percent (20%) of the state’s total annual revenues to fund transportation infrastructure.
(9) The United States Congress, consistent with its power to regulate interstate commerce
and pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 129, has authorized states to implement reconstruction or replacement
of a toll-free bridge and conversion of the bridge to a toll facility, provided that the state:
(i) Has in effect a law that permits tolling on a bridge prior to commencing any such
activity; and
(ii) Otherwise complies with the requirements of 23 U.S.C. § 129.
42-13.1-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings,
unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning:
(1) “Availability payment” means a payment by the department under a contract for a toll
facility or any other facility that is based on the availability of the facility at a specified performance
level and may include, without limitation, compensation for operations, maintenance, and financing
of the facility.
(2) “Department” means the department of transportation, or, if the department shall be
abolished, the board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or upon
LC001044 - Page 8 of 15

whom the powers given by chapter 5 of title 37 to the department shall be given by law.
(3) “Large commercial truck” shall be defined pursuant to the Federal Highway
Administration (FHWA) vehicle classification schedule as any vehicle within Class 8 - single
trailer, three (3) or four (4) axles, up to and including Class 13 - seven (7) or more axle multi-trailer
trucks, as such classifications may be revised from time to time by the FHWA.
(4) “Other vehicle” means any vehicle that has not been defined pursuant to this chapter as
a large commercial truck.
(5) “Passenger vehicle” shall be defined pursuant to the Federal Highway Administration
(FHWA) vehicle classification schedule as any vehicle within Class 1, 2, and 3 as such
classifications may be revised from time to time by the FHWA.
(6) “Radio frequency identification transponder” or “RFID” means a toll collection system
approved by the department that may consist of a toll tag placed inside the vehicle and an overhead
antenna that reads the toll tag and collects the toll.
(7) “Toll evader” means, for the purposes of this chapter, any registered owner of any large
commercial truck that passes through any electronic tolling location as authorized pursuant to § 42-
13.1-4 and who does not pay the required toll and/or fees, fines, or penalties within the maximum
allowable period specified under § 42-13.1-11.
(8) “Toll facility” means equipment or capital improvements funded in whole or in part by
toll revenue, or required to effectuate toll collection.
(9) “Turnpike and bridge authority” means the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority
(RITBA), a public instrumentality of the state of Rhode Island, created by the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 12 of title 24.
42-13.1-4. Authority to collect tolls on large commercial trucks only.
(a) The department is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for the
privilege of traveling on Rhode Island bridges to provide for replacement, reconstruction,
maintenance, and operation of Rhode Island bridges. The tolls shall be fixed after conducting a
cost-benefit analysis and providing an opportunity for public comment. The tolls shall be collected
on large commercial trucks only and shall not be collected on any other vehicle; provided, however,
no vehicle shall be tolled other than a tractor or truck tractor as defined in 23 C.F.R. 658.5, pulling
a trailer or trailers. No act authorizing tolls on passenger vehicles pursuant to this chapter shall take
effect until it has been approved by the majority of those electors voting in a statewide referendum.
The secretary of state shall certify the results of the statewide referendum. Tolls on large
commercial trucks may be implemented utilizing all-electric toll collection methodologies on a
cash-less basis, or utilizing any other methodologies determined by the department.
LC001044 - Page 9 of 15

(b) Subject to § 42-13.1-14, the department will establish a program to limit the assessment
of the tolls upon the same individual large commercial truck using a RFID to once per toll facility,
per day in each direction, or an equivalent frequency use program based upon individual large
commercial truck use.
(c) Subject to § 42-13.1-14, the total amount of tolls imposed upon the same individual
large commercial truck using a RFID for making a border-to-border through trip on Route 95
Connecticut to Route 95 Massachusetts, or the reverse, shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00).
(d) Subject to § 42-13.1-14, the daily maximum amount of the tolls collected upon the same
individual large commercial truck using a RFID shall not exceed forty dollars ($40.00).
(e) Tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board,
bureau, agency, or official of the state or any municipality or other political subdivision of the state
except the department.
42-13.1-5. Collection of tolls on passenger cars and other vehicles expressly
prohibited.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this statute, the department is expressly prohibited
from collecting tolls hereunder on other vehicles, herein defined to include motorcycles, passenger
cars, and all other vehicles classed one through seven (7) pursuant to the Federal Highway
Administration (FHWA) vehicle classification schedule.
42-13.1-6. Rhode Island bridge replacement, reconstruction and maintenance fund
established.
(a) There is hereby created a special account in the intermodal surface transportation fund,
as established in § 31-36-20, to be known as the Rhode Island bridge replacement, reconstruction,
and maintenance fund (“the fund”).
(b) The fund shall consist of all those monies received by the department under this chapter,
including:
(1) The monies received through the collection of tolls on bridges in Rhode Island;
(2) Any fees, fines, or penalties collected pursuant to this chapter; and
(3) Investment earnings on amounts credited to the fund.
(c) Unexpended balances and any earnings thereon shall not revert to the general fund but
shall remain in the Rhode Island bridge replacement, reconstruction, and maintenance fund. There
shall be no requirement that monies received into the fund during any given calendar year or fiscal
year be expended during the same calendar year or fiscal year.
42-13.1-7. Designation of toll bridges.
The director of the department may designate any Rhode Island bridge on the National
LC001044 - Page 10 of 15

Highway System as a toll bridge in order to facilitate the financing of replacement, reconstruction,
and maintenance of Rhode Island’s system of bridges.
42-13.1-8. Amount of tolls.
The department’s authority to fix and adjust the amount of tolls shall be determined by the
costs of replacement, reconstruction, maintenance, and operation of Rhode Island’s system of
bridges and/or any portion or portions thereof, including costs associated with the acquisition,
construction, operation, and maintenance of the toll facilities and administrative costs in connection
therewith.
42-13.1-9. Limitations on use of revenue.
All revenue collected pursuant to this chapter and deposited to the Rhode Island bridge
replacement, reconstruction, and maintenance fund shall be used to pay the costs associated with
the operation and maintenance of the toll facility, and the replacement, reconstruction,
maintenance, and operation of Rhode Island bridges on the National Highway System or any other
use permitted under 23 U.S.C. § 129.
42-13.1-10. Procurement of toll facilities.
Without limiting any right of the department to award contracts under any other law, the
department shall have the right to procure toll facilities through contracts aggregating the services
of design, engineering, construction, finance, operations, maintenance, or any combination of the
foregoing. Notwithstanding any requirement of law to the contrary, the department may award such
contracts on the basis of competitive negotiation in accordance with § 37-2-19. Such contracts may
include availability payments or any other compensation structure determined appropriate by the
department to further the objectives of this chapter.
42-13.1-11. Penalty for nonpayment of toll.
(a) The department shall have the authority to establish and collect fees, fines, and penalties
from registered owners of large commercial trucks who use, or attempt to use, any toll facility
established under § 42-13.1-4, without paying the toll at the rate then in force for such use.
(b) Any fee, fine, or penalty shall be in addition to the toll or tolls initially incurred and
shall be no less than an amount sufficient to cover the cost of administration and collection of said
fines, fees, and penalties.
(c) The registered owner of the large commercial truck subject to toll shall be primarily
responsible for all tolls, fees, fines, and penalties assessed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Prior to the collection of any toll on large commercial trucks, the department shall
establish a maximum allowable period for the payment of tolls and any subsequent fees, fines, and
penalties assessed.
LC001044 - Page 11 of 15

42-13.1-12. Additional penalties — Toll evasion.
Any toll evader who fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll and such fees, fines,
and penalties as assessed under § 42-13.1-11 and within the maximum allowable period specified
therein, shall be required to pay a fine not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) and shall pay
the toll amount due and any administrative costs, or shall have their registration suspended until
payment is made in full for the violation. A toll evader under this section shall receive a traffic
violation summons which shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the traffic tribunal. All amounts due
under this section shall be remitted to the Rhode Island bridge replacement, reconstruction, and
maintenance fund.
42-13.1-13. Conformance to statute, rules, and regulations.
All programs and funding proposals shall conform to applicable federal law, rules, and
regulations. The department shall promulgate state rules and regulations to carry out the purposes
of this chapter. Included within said rules and regulations shall be a provision requiring any public
comment period to continue for at least thirty (30) days and a provision requiring advance
notification to be provided to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and president
of the senate prior to any announcement of public hearing or public comment period establishing
or modifying the amount of tolls to be collected. In promulgating these rules and regulations, the
department shall establish policies and procedures that promote procedural transparency.
42-13.1-14. Severability.
If a part of this chapter is held unconstitutional or invalid, all valid parts that are severable
from the invalid or unconstitutional part remain in effect. If a part of this chapter is held
unconstitutional or invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in effect in all
constitutional and valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications. This
severability clause shall be applicable to each provision of this chapter, regardless of whether or
not any particular provision references this section.
42-13.1-15. Bridge preservation and salt mitigation.
(a) In any fiscal year when the department fails to complete appropriate bridge
maintenance, no new construction and design contracts subject to reporting under § 42-13.1-16
shall be awarded for the subsequent year or until proof of appropriate bridge maintenance is
provided.
(b) The director must submit detailed information regarding bridge maintenance activities
undertaken during the fiscal year to the governor, office of management and budget, the speaker of
the house, and the president of the senate no later than thirty (30) days after the fiscal year ends,
beginning with fiscal year 2017. The information shall also be posted on the department’s website.
LC001044 - Page 12 of 15

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 42-13.1-16, bridge maintenance requirements may
be waived if the director certifies that:
(1) Certain bridges are in a state of disrepair such that maintenance activities will not
forestall further deterioration; or
(2) Certain bridges have a maintenance plan that does not require any activities during any
given calendar year; or
(3) Certain bridges have been modified such that maintenance to prevent salt erosion and
deterioration is no longer required; or
(4) The department has not used salt on certain bridges or has stopped using salt for winter
maintenance as a long-term change in practice; or
(5) Other specific circumstances exist to eliminate the need for maintenance activities in
any given calendar year.
(d) Failure to comply is subject to the penalties contained in § 35-3-24.
42-13.1-16. Reporting.
The department shall submit to the office of management and budget, the house fiscal
advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor, a report on the progress of implementation of this chapter
within thirty (30) days of the close of each of the fiscal quarters of each year. The reports shall also
be posted on the department’s website. The reports shall include, at a minimum:
(1) Construction and design contracts of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or
greater planned to be advertised in the upcoming federal fiscal year, their value, and expected award
date;
(2) Construction and design contracts of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or
greater awarded in the prior federal fiscal year, date of award, value, and expected substantial
completion date;
(3) Expected final cost of:
(i) Any construction contracts of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or greater that
reached substantial completion in the prior federal fiscal year; and
(ii) Any design contracts of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or greater completed
in the prior federal fiscal year;
(4) Total number of workers employed through the contract and the number of the workers
in that total with a Rhode Island address; and
(5) This report shall also include a current list of all federal, discretionary, and any other
grants that the department has applied for and the status of that application and identify any changes
from the prior report. For any grants that require a state match, the department shall identify if the
LC001044 - Page 13 of 15

source for the state’s match is available under currently authorized funding.
42-13.1-17. Equality of opportunity.
No bid under this chapter shall be deemed complete nor awarded if the bid fails to include
a specific written plan for the bidder to be in conformity with § 37-14.1-6, ensuring that minority
business enterprises reach a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the dollar value of the bid. Pursuant
to §§ 37-14.1-1 and 37-14.1-3, for the purposes of chapter 13.1 of title 42, women shall be included
in the definition of “minority business enterprise.” The aforementioned written plan should be
submitted on forms created and distributed by the director of administration.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001044
========
LC001044 - Page 14 of 15